test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-С_А-чувство_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - чувство M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: чу́вство
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: чу́вство
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: чу́вства
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: чу́встве
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: чу́вству
      чувство+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: чу́вством
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: чу́вства
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: чу́вства
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: чу́вств
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: чу́вствах
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: чу́вствам
      чувство+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: чу́вствами
